src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON n_ien_pl !FIX!!
 +N+Pl+Nom:ne%> t_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:n^HMETA%>hee t_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Nom:h%>nee t_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:n%>ie n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Par:n%>i^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:n^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:hnii n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:n%>hei2ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:h%>nei2ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:n%>hei2st^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:h%>nei2st^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:n%>hei2le PxxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:h%>nei2le PxxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:n%>hei2l^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:h%>nei2l^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:n%>hei2lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:h%>nei2lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:n%>hei2tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:h%>nei2tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:n%>hei2nn^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:h%>nei2nn^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Tra:hei2 TRA ;


LEXICON n_uus  !vajavuus
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Sg+Nom:s     R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: s_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%> n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Par:t%>t^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:t^HMETA%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:%>ess^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:%>est^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+All:%>ele PxxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ade:%>el^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abl:%>elt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>ett^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:t%>en^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra:e TRA ;

 +N+Pl+Nom:%>e t_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:ks%>i2e n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Par:ks%>i2^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:ks%>hii n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:ks%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:ks%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:ks%>i2le PxxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:ks%>i2l^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:ks%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:ks%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Tra:ksi TRA ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:ks%>i2n^A PxK ;

LEXICON n_uus_odd ! for odd syllabel-stems: suuruue->(suuruuele pga lång vokal men) suuruuksille 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N+Sg+Nom:s     R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n R ;
 +N+Sg+Nom: s_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%> n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Par:t%>t^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:t^HMETA%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:%>ess^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:%>est^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+All:%>ele PxxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ade:%>el^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abl:%>elt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>ett^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:t%>en^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra:e TRA ;

 +N+Pl+Nom:%>e t_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:ks%>i2e n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Par:ks%>i2^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:ks%>hii n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:ks%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:ks%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:ks%>i2lle PxxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:ks%>i2ll^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:ks%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:ks%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Tra:ksi TRA ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:ks%>i2n^A PxK ;

 
!! ### 2-syllabic LNR final stems

LEXICON 3n_lnr 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** ahven - ahvenheen
+N+Sg+Gen:e%>n R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:e%> n_PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ill:%>hee n_PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>hee n_PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ine:%>ess^A PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ess:%>en^A PxK ;
3n_lnr_inteill ; 

LEXICON 3n_kymmen
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 3n_kymmen
3n_lnr ;
+N+Pl+Par:%>i^A PxK ; 

LEXICON 30n_lnr
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** askel - askelheesheen
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:^HMET2%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%> n_PxK ; !två genetivformer? askelen, askelheen
 !+N+Sg+Gen:^HMETA%>hee n_PxK ; askehleen? 
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>heeshee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>heeshee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:%>heess^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:^HMET2%>heess^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:%>heen^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:^HMET2%>heen^A PxK ;
 3n_lnr_inteill ; 

LEXICON TYÄR
+N+Sg+Nom:tyär K ; 
+N+Sg+Par:tytärtä K ;
+N+Sg+Par:tyärtä K ;
+N+Pl+Gen:tyttäritten K ;
         :tyttär 3xn_lnr ;

LEXICON n_kasuven !!FIXA 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** 
+N+Sg+Nom:ve n_PxK ; 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>hvii n_PxK ;
+N+Sg+Ela:ven%>st^A PxK ;

+N+Pl+Ill:ve^HMETA%>hii n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ill:ve^HMET2%>hii n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+All:v%>i2lle PxK ;

LEXICON 3xn_lnr
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** tyär, kort och lång Ill
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%>n R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:e%> n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:%>heeshee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:^HMET2%>heeshee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>hee n_PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ine:%>ess^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ess:%>en^A PxK ;
 3n_lnr_inteill ; 

LEXICON 3n_lnr_inteill 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** inte Ill, Ine, Ess men alla andra
+N+Sg+Nom:^WG  R ;
+N+Sg+Nom:^WG PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Par:^WG%>t^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ela:%>est^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+All:%>elle PxxK ;
 +N+Sg+Ade:%>ell^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abl:%>elt^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Abe:%>ett^A PxK ;
 +N+Sg+Tra:e TRA ;

 +N+Pl+Nom:e%> t_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Gen:^WG%>te n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Par:e%>it^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:%>hii n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>hii n_PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ine:%>iss^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ela:%>ist^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+All:%>ille PxxK ;
 +N+Pl+Ade:%>ill^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abl:%>ilt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Abe:%>itt^A PxK ;
 +N+Pl+Tra:%>i TRA ;
 +N+Pl+Ess:%>in^A PxK ;



LEXICON 4n_ks
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +N: x4n_ks ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:s R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:kse%>n R ;

LEXICON x4n_ks
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 x4n_ks_sg ;
 x4n_ks_pl ;

LEXICON x4n_ks_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Sg+Nom: st_PxK ;
 +Sg+Gen:kse%> n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Par:s%>t^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ill:kse^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ;
 +Sg+Ine:kse%>ss^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ela:kse%>st^A PxK ;
 +Sg+All:kse%>le PxxK ;
 +Sg+Ade:kse%>l^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abl:kse%>lt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Ess:kse%>n^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Abe:kse%>tt^A PxK ;
 +Sg+Tra:kse TRA ;


LEXICON x4n_ks_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +Pl+Nom:kse%> t_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:s%>te n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:kse%>i2^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ine:kse%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ill:ks%>hii n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:kse%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:kse%>i2le PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:kse%>i2l^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:kse%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ess:kse%>i2n^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abe:kse%>i2tt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:ksi TRA ;





!! ### Sublexica for cases

LEXICON TRA
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Err/Orth:%>ks K ; ! VetEj
 :%>ks i_PxK ;

!! ### Sublexica for possessive suffixes
! ---------------------------------

!! Px is now not in use, with one exception, comitative.

LEXICON n_PxK  !!≈ @CODE@ has either -n or goes to Px
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  :n K  ;
     Px ;

LEXICON a_PxK  !!≈ @CODE@ has either -s or goes to Px with -a
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  :s K  ;
  :a Px ;

LEXICON s_PxK  !!≈ @CODE@ has either -s or goes to Px 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  :s K  ;
  Px ;

LEXICON sh_PxK  !!≈ @CODE@ has either -s or goes to Px with -he-
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  :s K  ;
  :he Px ;

LEXICON st_PxK  !!≈ @CODE@ has either -s or goes to Px with -te- rakuaus, rakhauteni
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  :s K  ;
  :te Px ;

LEXICON t_PxK  !!≈ @CODE@ has either -t or goes to Px
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  :t K  ;
     Px ;

LEXICON i_PxK  !!≈ @CODE@ Tra: -i or -e and goes to Px
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  :i K  ;
  :e Px ;

LEXICON PxK !!≈ @CODE@ has only -nsA, compare PxxK
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  K  ;
  Px ;

LEXICON PxxK  !!≈ @CODE@ has also -Vn, thus both .. llensa and ..lleen.
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
  KK    ; ! All, so KK not K
  Px    ;
  Px-Vn ;

!LEXICON Pxx ! nsA and Vn
!  Px    ;
!  Px-Vn ;

LEXICON Px
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +PxSg1:%>ni    K ;
 +PxSg2:%>sti   K ;
 +PxSg3:%>ns%^A K ; !ns%^A varför %?
 +PxPl1:%>mm^A  K ; ! NB! -m^A ei hoidettu
 +PxPl2:%>nn^A  K ; ! NB! -n^A ei hoidettu
 +PxPl3:%>ns%^A K ; !ns%^A 


LEXICON Px-Vn
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 +PxSg3:%>%^Vn K ; ! 
 +PxSg3:^HMETA%>h^V^Vn K ; ! TEST FEB paikoilheen/paikoihleen
 +PxSg3:^HMET2%>h^V^Vn K ; ! TEST FEB paikoilheen/paikoihleen
 +PxPl3:%>%^Vn K ;

LEXICON n5_troppi
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+N+Sg+Nom:       PxK ; !! troppi
+N+Nom: R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%> n_PxK ; !! tropin
+N+Sg+Par:%>^A PxK ; !! troppia?
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ; ! trophiin
+N+Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ; ! trophiin
+N+Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;       ! tropissa
+N+Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxxK ;       ! tropista
+N+Sg+All:^WG%>le PxK ;        ! tropile
+N+Sg+Ade:^WG%>l^A PxK ;        ! tropila
+N+Sg+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;       ! tropilta
+N+Sg+Tra:^WG TRA ;             ! tropiksi
+N+Sg+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;           ! troppina
+N+Sg+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;       ! tropitta

+N+Pl+Nom:^WG%> t_PxK ;
!+N+Pl+Gen:^WG^IDEL%>i2tte n_PxK ; ! nu: troppitten rätt: tropitten
!+N+Pl+Gen:^IDEL%>i2e n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Par:%>^A PxK ; ! nu: --- rätt (kanske samma som Sg?) :	troppia?
+N+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>h^Vi n_PxK ;  
+N+Pl+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxxK ;
+N+Pl+All:^WG%>le PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ade:^WG%>l^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;
+N+Pl+Tra:^WG%> TRA ;
+N+Pl+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;     ! nu rätt: troppina
+N+Pl+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;

!x5_ie_pl ; !PLUS variantform med e i plural!
+N: x5_i_pl ;
!+N+Pl+Par:%>^A PxK ; !malmia, äitiä 

 
