src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@**
vuosikymmen:vuosikymmen 3n_kymmen ;
ikenheet:ike n_ien_pl ;
pahhuus:pahhuu n_uus_odd ;
laihuus:laihuu n_uus_odd ;
vanhuus:vanhuu n_uus_odd ;
turhuus:turhuu n_uus_odd ;
puoji:puoji n5_troppi ;
lapintakki:lapin#takki n5_troppi ;
plankki:plankki n5_troppi ;
merkki:merkki n5_troppi ;
vasikanhäkki:vasikan#häkki n5_troppi ;
varppitooli:varppi#tooli n5_troppi ;
voiklimppi:voi#klimppi n5_troppi ;
köhnärupi:köhnärupi n5_troppi ;
plyyvittifäri:plyyvitti#färi n5_troppi ;
sihti:sihti n5_troppi ; ! sihin
laiminlyönti:laimin#lyönti n5_troppi ;
konsti:konsti n5_troppi ;
tapeetti:tapeetti n5_troppi ;
valeiltti:valeiltti n5_troppi ;
tontti:tontti n5_troppi ;
puolatortti:puolatortti n5_troppi ;
villitauti:villitauti n5_troppi ;
travi:travi n5_troppi ;
laajuus:laajuu n_uus_odd ;
orjuus:orjuu n_uus_odd ;
piikuus:piikuu n_uus_odd ;
keskuus:keskuu n_uus_odd ;
nuoskuus:nuoskuu n_uus_odd ;
nuukuus:nuukuu n_uus_odd ;
sammal:sammal 30n_lnr ;
suesammal:sue#sammal 30n_lnr ;
koskisammal:koski#sammal 30n_lnr ;
pounusammal:pounu#sammal 30n_lnr ;
taival:taipal 30n_lnr ;
koskitaival:koski#taipal 30n_lnr ;
askel:askel 30n_lnr ;
petkel:petkel 30n_lnr ;
kyynel:kyynel 30n_lnr ;
vemmel:vempel 30n_lnr ;
pistel:pistel 30n_lnr ;
mahottomuus:mahottomuu n_uus ;
höyhen:höyhen 3n_lnr ;
siemen:siemen 3n_lnr ;
kaurasiemen:kaura#siemen 3n_lnr ;
paimen:paimen 3n_lnr ;
lamphaanpaimen:lamphaan#paimen 3n_lnr ;
lammaspaimen:lammas#paimen 3n_lnr ;
taimen:taimen 3n_lnr ;
kymmen:kymmen 3n_lnr ;
koskuskymmen:koskuskymmen 3n_lnr ;
karhunkämmen:karhun#kämmen 3n_lnr ;
joutsen:joutsen 3n_lnr ;
nilkkajäsen:nilkka#jäsen 3n_lnr ;
ahmajäsen:ahma#jäsen 3n_lnr ;
jorvajäsen:jorva#jäsen 3n_lnr ;
kyynäspäänjäsen:kyynäspään#jäsen 3n_lnr ;
ahven:ahven 3n_lnr ;
norjanahven:norjan#ahven 3n_lnr ;
riven:riven 3n_lnr ;
nurinniskon:nurinniskon 3n_lnr ;
kristisisar:kristi#sisar 3n_lnr ;
penger:penker 30n_lnr ;
manner:manter 30n_lnr ; ! xxx check
tanner:tanter 30n_lnr ;
jääntanner:jään#tanter 30n_lnr ;
huoruus:huoruu n_uus_odd ;
pirruus:pirruu n_uus_odd ;
tyär: TYÄR ;
vanhaatyär:vanhaa# TYÄR ;
jalkatyär:jalka# TYÄR ;
ottotyär:otto# TYÄR ;
hiljasuus:hiljasuu n_uus ;
lapselisuus:lapselisuu n_uus ;
maaossuus:maaossuu n_uus ;
kasuven:kasu n_kasuven ;
viivalus:viivalu 4n_ks ;
tutkimus:tutkimu 4n_ks ;
kostanus:kostanu 4n_ks ;
lommerus:lommeru 4n_ks ;
nuoruus:nuoruu n_uus_odd ;
kuljetus:kuljetu 4n_ks ;
kallitus:kallitu 4n_ks ;
sekotus:sekotu 4n_ks ;
ihastus:ihastu 4n_ks ;
vahvistus:vahvistu 4n_ks ;
juoksutus:juoksutu 4n_ks ;
vahvuus:vahvuu n_uus ;
sähkölämmitys:sähkö#lämmity 4n_ks ;
pyhhyys:pyhhyy n_uus_odd ;
vähhyys:vähhyy n_uus_odd ;
mäljyys:mäljyy n_uus_odd ;
märkyys:märkyy n_uus_odd ;
kylmyys:kylmyy n_uus_odd ;
vääryys:vääryy n_uus_odd ;
likkeisyys:likkeisyy n_uus ;
ryöttyys:ryöttyy n_uus_odd ;
syvvyys:syvvyy n_uus_odd ;
sieppaus:sieppau n_uus ;
sepälys:sepäly 4n_ks ;
salhaisuus:salhaisuu n_uus ;
sävel:sävel 3n_kymmen ;
slaskisinkki:slaski#sinkki n5_troppi ;
solidaarisuus:solidaarisuu n_uus ;
haluttomuus:haluttomuu n_uus ;
hengenpuhalus:hengen#puhalu 4n_ks ;
herkkäuskosuus:herkkäuskosuu n_uus ;
hivel:hivel 30n_lnr ;
myönitys:myönity 4n_ks ;
malmipitosuus:malmipitosuu n_uus ;
avaruus:avaruu n_uus ;
atvokaattikostanus:atvokaattikostanu 4n_ks ;
kaunokirjalisuus:kaunokirjalisuu n_uus ;
kommunistityär:kommunisti# TYÄR ;
kilven:kilven 3n_lnr ;
yhtheisymmärys:yhtheisymmäry 4n_ks ;
yhtheenlyönti:yhtheenlyönti n5_troppi ;
öljymaalaus:öljymaalau n_uus ;
peruskysymys:peruskysymy 4n_ks ;
poovaus:poovau n_uus ;
polkemisaskel:polkemis#askel 30n_lnr ;
pikkutyär:pikku# TYÄR ;
pajalantyär:pajalan# TYÄR ;
loppaus:loppau n_uus ;
ronkkanivel:ronkka#nivel 30n_lnr ;
ronkkonivel:ronkko#nivel 30n_lnr ;
ruumhiinkääritys:ruumhiinkäärity 4n_ks ;
balettityär:baletti# TYÄR ;
vaksineeraus:vaksineerau n_uus ;
veroalenus:vero#alenu 4n_ks ;
katolisuus:katolisuu n_uus ;
kaviaaripurkki:kaviaari#purkki n5_troppi ;
kaksostyär:kaksos# TYÄR ;
kehotus:kehotu 4n_ks ;
kiinalaistyär:kiinalais# TYÄR ;
karvaus:karvau n_uus ;
tonnoorinkityär:tonnoorinki# TYÄR ;
taivutus:taivutu 4n_ks ;
tislaus:tislau n_uus ;
enkeltyär:enkel# TYÄR ;
